North Carolina, session 2025, HB751.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Any electric public utility, as defined in G.S. 62-3(23), serving at least
150,000 North Carolina retail jurisdictional customers as of January 1, 2025, that has established
a rate schedule for seasonal or intermittent service in a portion of the utility's service area shall,
no later than September 1, 2025, file an application for a rate case to offer that rate schedule for
seasonal or intermittent service to all eligible customers throughout the State served by the
electric public utility.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H751-v-1*